Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0984.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 271. A state agency shall not use software to create an official communication or document that contains a person's name unless the software allows hyphens, bicapitalization, and apostrophes to be used in the person's name and produces the person's name accurately on the communication or document.